Nevada, session 83, AB363.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 534.035 is hereby amended to read as follows:
534.035 1. In each area designated as a groundwater basin by
the State Engineer pursuant to the provisions of NRS 534.030 [, the]
:
(a) If the designated groundwater basin is located in one
county, the board of county commissioners may [recommend to the
State Engineer] request that the State Engineer establish a
groundwater board. The State Engineer shall determine whether or
not a groundwater board is to be established and may direct its
establishment by order.
(b) If the designated groundwater basin is located in more
than one county:
(1) A board of county commissioners may request or the
board of county commissioners of the counties may jointly request
that the State Engineer establish a groundwater board.
(2) Regardless of whether a groundwater board is requested
jointly to be established, the State Engineer may appoint members
of the groundwater board in accordance with subsection 3 for any
county in which the designated groundwater basin is located.
2. Not more than one groundwater board may be established
in a designated groundwater basin pursuant to subsection 1.
3. If a groundwater board is [established, the governing bodies
of all the cities and towns within the designated area, the board of
county commissioners of each county in which the area is located,
and the governing body of any water district in which the area is
included, or partly included, shall each submit a list of names of
residents of the area to the Governor, who] established pursuant to
subsection 1, the State Engineer shall appoint seven members of
the board [. At least one member must be appointed from each list.
3. After the initial terms, the] as follows:
-
*AB363_R1*

– 3 –
(a) Four members, each of whom holds a permit or certificate
to appropriate water within the designated groundwater basin with
a senior date of priority, as determined by the State Engineer;
(b) Two members, each of whom holds a permit or certificate
to appropriate water within the designated groundwater basin with
a junior date of priority, as determined by the State Engineer; and
(c) One member who holds a permit or certificate, or permits
or certificates, within the designated groundwater basin for the
greatest quantity of groundwater in the basin, or if such a person
is already appointed or unwilling to serve, the person who holds a
permit or certificate, or permits or certificates, in the designated
groundwater basin for the next greatest quantity of groundwater
in the basin, as determined by the State Engineer.
4. In addition to the members appointed pursuant to
subsection 3, the board of county commissioners or boards of
county commissioners, as applicable, may appoint a nonvoting
member to the groundwater board.
5. The board of county commissioners or boards of county
commissioners, as applicable, may submit a list of names of
persons who are eligible for appointment pursuant to subsection 3
to the State Engineer, who may appoint members to the
groundwater board from the list.
6. The term of office of each member of the board is 4 years.
The groundwater board shall elect one member as chair and one
member as secretary to serve as such at the pleasure of the
groundwater board.
[4.] 7. The groundwater board shall [maintain its headquarters
at the county seat of] hold public meetings and any physical
location for such public meetings must be in the county in which
the designated area is located, or if the area lies in more than one
county [,] and the counties jointly requested the establishment of
the groundwater board, in [the county seat of] one of the counties
in which the area is located. The board shall hold meetings at such
times and places as it may determine. Special meetings may be
called at any time by the secretary at the request of any four
members, or by the chair, upon notice specifying the matters to be
acted upon at the meeting. No matters other than those specified in
the notice may be acted upon at that meeting unless all members are
present and consent thereto.
[5.] 8. A majority of the groundwater board constitutes a
quorum, and the groundwater board shall act only by a majority of
those present.
[6. For each day’s attendance at each meeting of the
groundwater board, or for each day when services are actually
performed for the groundwater board, the members are entitled to
-
*AB363_R1*

– 4 –
receive per diem and travel allowances provided by law. Claims for
those expenses must be paid as provided in subsection 7 of
NRS 534.040.
7.] 9. Members of the groundwater board serve without
compensation.
10. The State Engineer shall [not approve any application or
issue any permit to drill a well, appropriate groundwater, change the
place or manner of use or the point of diversion of water within the
designated area, adopt any related regulations or enter any related
orders until the State Engineer has conferred with the board and
obtained its] consider the written advice and recommendations [.] of
the groundwater board on reducing overpumping in the
designated groundwater basin.
[8. It is the intention of the Legislature that the State Engineer
and the board be in agreement whenever possible, but, for the
purpose of fixing responsibility to the Governor, if] If there is any
disagreement between the State Engineer and the groundwater
board, the views of the State Engineer prevail. A [written report of
any such disagreement must be made immediately to the Governor
by the State Engineer and the board.
9. Any] decision of the State Engineer to comply or not
comply with the views of the groundwater board is not subject to
judicial review. A disagreement between the State Engineer and a
groundwater board is not admissible in any proceeding
challenging a decision of the State Engineer.
11. A groundwater board [may request from the State Engineer
or any other state, county, city or district agency such technical
information, data and advice as it may require to perform its
functions, and] :
(a) Must be dissolved 4 years after the date the board is
established by the State Engineer [and such other agencies shall,
within the resources available to them, furnish such assistance as
may be requested.
10. The Governor may dissolve the groundwater board by
order if the Governor determines that the future activities of the
board are likely to be insubstantial.] pursuant to subsection 3,
unless the State Engineer approves a request from the board of
county commissioners or boards of county commissioners, as
applicable, to continue the groundwater board for any additional
4-year term; and
(b) May be dissolved by a majority vote of the groundwater
board at a meeting of the board.
Sec. 2. NRS 534.040 is hereby amended to read as follows:
534.040 1. Upon the initiation of the administration of this
chapter in any particular basin, and where the investigations of the
-
*AB363_R1*

– 5 –
State Engineer have shown the necessity for the supervision over the
waters of that basin, the State Engineer may employ a well
supervisor and other necessary assistants, who shall execute the
duties as provided in this chapter under the direction of the State
Engineer. The salaries of the well supervisor and the assistants of
the well supervisor must be fixed by the State Engineer. The well
supervisor and assistants are exempt from the provisions of chapter
284 of NRS.
2. If the money available from the license fees provided for in
NRS 534.140 is not sufficient to pay those salaries, together with
necessary expenses, including the compensation and other expenses
of the Well Drillers’ Advisory Board, the board of county
commissioners shall, except as otherwise provided in this
subsection, levy a special assessment annually, or at such time as the
assessment is needed, upon all taxable property situated within the
confines of the area designated by the State Engineer to come under
the provisions of this chapter in an amount as is necessary to pay
such salaries and expenses. If the board of county commissioners
determines that the amount of a special assessment levied upon a
property owner pursuant to this section when combined with the
amount of all other taxes and assessments levied upon the property
owner is less than the cost of collecting the special assessment
levied pursuant to this subsection, the board of county
commissioners may exempt the property owner from the assessment
and appropriate money from the general fund of the county to pay
the cost of the assessment.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, in designated
areas within which the use of groundwater is predominantly for
agricultural purposes, any special assessment levied pursuant to this
section must be charged against each water user who has a permit to
appropriate water or a perfected water right, and the charge against
each water user must be based upon the proportion which his or her
water right bears to the aggregate water rights in the designated
area. The minimum charge is $1.
4. The salaries and expenses may be paid by the State Engineer
from the Water Distribution Revolving Account pending the levy
and collection of an assessment levied pursuant to this section.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, if a special
assessment is levied pursuant to this section, the proper officers of
the county shall levy and collect the special assessment as other
special assessments are levied and collected, and the assessment is a
lien upon the property.
6. Any special assessment collected pursuant to this section
must be deposited with the State Treasurer for credit to the Water
District Account to be accounted for in basin well accounts.
-
*AB363_R1*

– 6 –
7. [Upon determination and certification by the State Engineer
of the amount to be budgeted for the current or ensuing fiscal year
for the purpose of paying the per diem and travel allowances of the
groundwater board and employing consultants or other help needed
to fulfill its responsibilities, the State Controller shall transfer that
amount to a separate operating account for that fiscal year for the
groundwater basin. Claims against the account must be approved by
the groundwater board and paid as other claims against the State are
paid.] The State Engineer may use money in a particular basin well
account to support an activity outside the basin in which the money
is collected if the activity bears a direct relationship to the
responsibilities or activities of the State Engineer regarding the
particular groundwater basin.
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB363_R1*